zh-CN: 马克笔尖端设计: 刷子; 子弹; 凿子; 细; 其他
pt-BR: Formato da ponta do marcador: Pincel; Marcador; Formão; Ralo; Outro
sk-SK: Dizajn hrotu fixky: Štetec; Guľka; Sekáč; Jemný; Iné
el: Σχεδιασμός μύτης μαρκαδόρου: Βούρτσα; Με σχήμα μυτερού κώνου; Σμίλη; Λεπτές; Άλλο
sl-SI: Zasnova konice pisala: Čopič; Krogličast; Dleto; Fino; Drugo
hr-HR: Oblik vrha markera: Četka; U obliku metka; Kosi; Tanki; Ostalo
ko: 마커 팁 디자인: 브러시; 불릿; 끌; 파인; 기타
lt-LT: Žymeklio galiuko dizainas: Teptukas; Kulkos formos; Kampinis; Smulkus; Kita
ro-RO: Design vârf marker: Perie; Glonț; Daltă; Subțire; Altele
bg-BG: Дизайн на върха на маркера: Четка; Куршум; Длето; Фин; Други
en: Marker tip design: Brush; Bullet; Chisel; Fine; Other
ru: Вид наконечника маркера: Кисть; Конус; Скошенный; Тонкий; Другой
pl: Konstrukcja końcówki markera: Pędzel; jednorazowo; Przecinak; Dobre; Inne
cs: Design hrotu popisovače: Štětec; Kulová; Dláto; Jemný; Jiné
hu: Markerhegy kialakítása: Ecset; Golyó; Véső; Finom; Egyéb
th: การออกแบบปลายหัวปากกาเคมี: แปรง; กระสุน; หัวตัด; บาง; อื่นๆ
de: Design der Markerspitze: Bürste; Kugel; Meißel; Fein; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Design de ponta de marcador: Pincel; Ponto; Cinzel; Fina; Outro
tr: İşaretleyici ucu tasarımı: Fırça; Kurşun; Keski; İnce; Diğer
es: Diseño de la punta del marcador: Pincel; Viñeta; Cincel; Fino; Otros
vi: Thiết kế đầu bút đánh dấu: Cọ; Đạn; Đục; Mảnh; Khác
sv: Utförande av markeringspennspets: Borste; Kula; Mejsel; Fint; Övrigt
da: Markørspidsdesign: Børste; Kugle; Mejsel; Fin; Andet
zh-TW: 記號筆筆尖設計: 畫筆; 子彈; 鑿型; 細; 其他
ja: マーカーの先端の種類: ブラシ; 弾丸; チッセル; ファイン; その他
fi: Huopakynän kärjen muotoilu: Sivellin; Luoti; Taltta; Ohut; Muu
fr: Conception de la pointe du marqueur: Brosse; Balle; Burin; Fin; Autre
nl: Ontwerp markertip: Borstel; Bullet; Beitel; Fijn; Andere
nb: Markeringstuppdesign: Børste; Kule; Meisel; Tynn; Annet
it: Design della punta del pennarello: Pennello; Proiettile; Scalpello; Fine; Altro